Massachusetts, session 194th, H3824.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 10 of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
Any city or town having a population over 12,000 and having a part-time veterans’ agent 
or part-time director of veterans’ services shall, at the start of the fiscal year, appoint a full time 
veteran’s agent or director of veterans’ services. If any city or town, having a population over 
12,000, fails to appoint a full time veteran’s agent or director of veterans’ services, the secretary 
shall issue a civil penalty, not to exceed $5,000, for each month of noncompliance. Each month 
of noncompliance by the city or town shall be deemed a separate offense and such penalty shall 
be in addition to any other penalties provided by law.